District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1102.04

Governance of the Corporation.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 204, 43 DCR 4962
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
1981 Ed., § 32-262.4.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
For temporary delay of the effective date of § 402 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Act of 1996, see § 501(c) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit corporation Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-388, August 28, 1996, 43 DCR 4937, § 501(c), and the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-421, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6093, and § 501(c) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Second congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-487, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 634.
Section 501(c) of the D.C. Law 11-212 provided that § 402 of the act shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to § 44-1102.04.